apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <!-- POS categories -->
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="mod"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="part"/>
    
    <!-- Gender -->
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>

    <!-- Number -->
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="card"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="coll"/>
    
    <!-- Person -->
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    
    <!-- Adj -->
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    
    <!-- Case -->
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    
    <!-- Voice -->
    <sdef n="actv"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"/>
    
    <!-- Affixes -->
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="ber-an"/>
    <sdef n="ber-kan"/>
    <sdef n="ber"/>
    <sdef n="i"/>
    <sdef n="kan"/>
    <sdef n="ke-an"/>
    <sdef n="ke"/>
    <sdef n="pe-an"/>
    <sdef n="pe"/>
    <sdef n="peN-an"/>
    <sdef n="peN"/>
    <sdef n="per-an"/>
    <sdef n="per-i"/>
    <sdef n="per-kan"/>
    <sdef n="per"/>
    <sdef n="se"/>
    <sdef n="ter"/>

    <sdef n="kah"/>
    <sdef n="pun"/>
    <sdef n="nya"/>
    
    <!-- Reduplication -->
    <sdef n="red"/>
    
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="subst"/>
    <sdef n="actio"/>
    <sdef n="attr"/>
    
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar"/> 
    <sdef n="lquest"/> 
    <sdef n="apos"/> 
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-</l>
        <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>,</l>
        <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="aposchar">
    <e>
        <i>'</i>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>’</l>
        <r>'</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cometa">
    <e>
        <par n="aposchar"/> 
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="apos"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="sent"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Yakobus__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Maria__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Indonesia__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ini__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ini__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="segala__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="sana__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="seseorang__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="saya__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="kami__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="kamu__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="kalian__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="dia__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="mereka__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ku__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
        
    <pardef n="Agustus__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="gula-gula/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="abad/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="akhir/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>annya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an-<prm/>an</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an-<prm/>annya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="Carla"><i>Carla</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maria"><i>Maria</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mary"><i>Mary</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Allen"><i>Allen</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fandy"><i>Fandy</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mohd"><i>Mohd</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Noorul"><i>Noorul</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Leo"><i>Leo</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="James"><i>James</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Australia"><i>Australia</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Boston"><i>Boston</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="India"><i>India</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jepang"><i>Jepang</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Perancis"><i>Perancis</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sydney"><i>Sydney</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ini"><i>ini</i><par n="ini__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="itu"><i>itu</i><par n="ini__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sana"><i>sana</i><par n="sana__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sini"><i>sini</i><par n="sana__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="situ"><i>situ</i><par n="sana__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sebagian"><i>sebagian</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="seseorang"><i>seseorang</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ketiganya"><i>ketiganya</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ketujuhnya"><i>ketujuhnya</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ketiga-tiganya"><i>ketiga-tiganya</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ketujuh-tujuhnya"><i>ketujuh-tujuhnya</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aku"><i>aku</i><par n="saya__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="daku"><i>daku</i><par n="saya__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="saya"><i>saya</i><par n="saya__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kami"><i>kami</i><par n="kami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kita"><i>kita</i><par n="kami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="anda"><i>anda</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dikau"><i>dikau</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="engkau"><i>engkau</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kamu"><i>kamu</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kalian"><i>kalian</i><par n="kalian__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="beliau"><i>beliau</i><par n="dia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dia"><i>dia</i><par n="dia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ia"><i>ia</i><par n="dia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mereka"><i>mereka</i><par n="mereka__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aku"><p><l>ku</l><r>aku</r></p><par n="ku__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kau"><i>kau</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Islam"><i>Islam</i><par n="Agustus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Nazi"><i>Nazi</i><par n="Agustus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Januari"><i>Januari</i><par n="Agustus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="September"><i>September</i><par n="Agustus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kamis"><i>Kamis</i><par n="Agustus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cumi-cumi"><i>cumi-cumi</i><par n="gula-gula/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gula-gula"><i>gula-gula</i><par n="gula-gula/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laba-laba"><i>laba-laba</i><par n="gula-gula/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paru-paru"><i>paru-paru</i><par n="gula-gula/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undang-undang"><i>undang-undang</i><par n="gula-gula/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dekompresi"><i>dekompresi</i><par n="abad/__n" prm="dekompresi"/></e>
    <e lm="intrik"><i>intrik</i><par n="abad/__n" prm="intrik"/></e>
    <e lm="lentur"><i>lentur</i><par n="abad/__n" prm="lentur"/></e>
    <e lm="perkakas"><i>perkakas</i><par n="abad/__n" prm="perkakas"/></e>
    <e lm="skor"><i>skor</i><par n="abad/__n" prm="skor"/></e>
    <e lm="cagar"><i>cagar</i><par n="akhir/__n" prm="cagar"/></e>
    <e lm="gugus"><i>gugus</i><par n="akhir/__n" prm="gugus"/></e>
    <e lm="kerling"><i>kerling</i><par n="akhir/__n" prm="kerling"/></e>
    <e lm="pandu"><i>pandu</i><par n="akhir/__n" prm="pandu"/></e>
    <e lm="sumur"><i>sumur</i><par n="akhir/__n" prm="sumur"/></e>
    <e lm="ini"><i>ini</i><par n="ini__det"/></e>
    <e lm="itu"><i>itu</i><par n="ini__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sebuah"><i>sebuah</i><par n="segala__det"/></e>
    <e lm="aneka"><i>aneka</i><par n="segala__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kebanyakan"><i>kebanyakan</i><par n="segala__det"/></e>
    <e lm="segala"><i>segala</i><par n="segala__det"/></e>
    <e lm="setiap"><i>setiap</i><par n="segala__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tiga"><p><l>ketiga</l><r>tiga</r></p><par n="segala__det"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="separ"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
